Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0234.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1304. (1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall develop and implement wireless communications device policies for elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools operated by the board or board of directors. A wireless communications device policy implemented under this section must seek to limit student cell phone use during school hours and reduce wireless communication device-related distractions in classroom settings, and may prohibit students from using a wireless communications device on school grounds during any of the following, as applicable: (a) Instructional time. (b) Breaks between instructional time. (c) Lunch. (d) Recess. (2) The board of a school district or the board of directors of a public school academy may implement additional restrictions regarding the use of wireless communications devices. (3) A wireless communications device policy implemented under this section must provide details regarding enforcement mechanisms that the school will use to achieve the goals of the policy. (4) A wireless communications device policy implemented under this section must provide exceptions for all of the following: (a) Emergency situations. (b) Devices necessary for medical use. (c) Devices provided as an accommodation to pupils as required under section 504 of title V of the rehabilitation act of 1973, 29 USC 794, or as part of an individualized education plan under title II of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 USC 12131 to 12165. (d) Any further exceptions implemented by the school's principal or chief administrator at the principal's or chief administrator's discretion. (5) The board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall post the wireless communications device policy implemented under this section on the school district's or public school academy's website. (6) As used in this section: (a) "School grounds" means a building, playing field, or property used for school purposes to impart instruction to children or used for functions and events sponsored by a school. School grounds does not include a building used primarily for adult education or college extension courses. (b) "Wireless communications device" means an electronic device capable of, but not limited to, text messaging, voice communication, entertainment, navigation, accessing the internet, or producing email.